Utah statutes.
58-40a-501.   Unprofessional conduct.

In addition to the provisions of Subsection 58-1-501(2), "unprofessional conduct" includes:

(1)  failing to report to the division an act or omission that violates a provision of this chapter by a licensee, applicant, or another individual;

(2)  interfering with an investigation of a disciplinary proceeding by willful misrepresentation of facts or by use of threats or harassment against a client or witness to prevent that individual from providing evidence in a disciplinary proceeding, investigation, or other legal action;

(3)  failing to maintain client confidentiality unless otherwise required by law;

(4)  promoting an unnecessary device, treatment, intervention, or service for financial gain by the athletic trainer or a third party; and

(5)  failing to maintain adequate records.



Amended by Chapter 262, 2013 General Session

